Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1008.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 102 of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a definition to read:§ 102. Definitions.Subject to additional definitions contained in subsequent provisions of this title which are applicable to specific provisions of this title, the following words and phrases when used in this title shall have, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the meanings given to them in this section:* * *"Low-speed electric scooter." As follows:(1) A device weighing less than 100 pounds that:1234567891011121314151617181920 (i) has handlebars and an electric motor;(ii) has a floorboard that can be stood upon while riding or a seat that can be sat upon while riding; and(iii) is solely powered by the electric motor or human power, or both.(2) The term does not include a pedalcycle with electric assist, electric personal assistive mobility device, motorcycle, motorized pedalcycle or motor-driven cycle.* * *Section 2. Section 1508 of Title 75 is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 1508. Examination of applicant for driver's license.* * *(c.2) Driver examination.--The portion of the examination on traffic laws required by this section shall contain at least one question on other road users relating to the driver's ability to drive safely near pedestrians, pedalcycles and other active transportation road users. The driver's manual shall include a section relating to driving safely near pedestrians, pedalcycles and other active transportation road users.* * *Section 3. Chapter 35 of Title 75 is amended by adding a subchapter to read:SUBCHAPTER GLOW-SPEED ELECTRIC SCOOTERSSec.3597.1. Scope of subchapter.3597.2. Title and registration exemption.3597.3. Operation of low-speed electric scooters.3597.4. Applicability of pedalcycle traffic laws.20250SB1008PN1183 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 3597.5. Public awareness.3597.6. Local enforcement.§ 3597.1. Scope of subchapter.This subchapter relates to the operation of low-speed electric scooters on certain highways or roadways in this Commonwealth.§ 3597.2. Title and registration exemption.Notwithstanding Subchapter A of Chapter 11 (relating to certificate of title) or Subchapter A of Chapter 13 (relating to general provisions), a low-speed electric scooter authorized under this section shall not be required to satisfy certificate of title or vehicle registration requirements under this title.§ 3597.3. Operation of low-speed electric scooters.(a) Speed limitation.--A person may not operate a low-speed electric scooter at a speed greater than 20 miles per hour on a pedalcycle lane on a highway, a roadway or a pedalcycle path.(b) Age limitation.--A person under 16 years of age may not operate a low-speed electric scooter.(c) Helmet requirement.--A person under 18 years of age may not operate a low-speed electric scooter unless the person is wearing a pedalcycle helmet that meets the requirements of section 3510 (relating to pedalcycle helmets for certain persons).(d) Number of riders.--A low-speed electric scooter may not be operated to carry more persons at one time than the number for which the device is designed and equipped.§ 3597.4. Applicability of pedalcycle traffic laws.(a) General rule.--A person riding a low-speed electric scooter upon a roadway has all rights and is subject to all duties applicable to a rider of a pedalcycle under this title, 20250SB1008PN1183 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 including sections 3501 (relating to applicability of traffic laws to pedalcycles), 3502 (relating to penalty for violation of subchapter), 3503 (relating to responsibility of parent or guardian), 3505 (relating to riding on roadways and pedalcycle paths), 3506 (relating to articles carried by operator), 3507 (relating to lamps and other equipment on pedalcycles), 3508 (relating to pedalcycles on sidewalks and pedalcycle paths), 3509 (relating to parking), 3510(b.1), (b.2), (b.3), (c), (d) and (e) (relating to pedalcycle helmets for certain persons), 3511 (relating to pedalcycles prohibited on freeways) and 3513 (relating to civil immunity for lenders of pedalcycle helmets), except as to special provisions in this subchapter and except as to provisions of this title that by their nature can have no application.(b) Penalty.--A person that violates a provision of this subchapter is guilty of a summary offense and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay the fine under section 3502.§ 3597.5. Public awareness.(a) Education toolkit.--The department, in consultation with the Pedalcycle and Pedestrian Advisory Committee established under Subchapter D (relating to Pedalcycle and Pedestrian Advisory Committee), shall develop and electronically distribute communication and education materials for municipalities and local law enforcement to use for the education of riders and drivers on the law relating to pedestrians and pedalcycles, including low-speed electric scooters. The department shall post the educational resources on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.(b) Consumer notice.--On and after January 1, 2026, a seller of low-speed electric scooters shall provide written notice to 20250SB1008PN1183 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 purchasers of the provisions of this chapter applicable to low-speed electric scooters, including the age, speed, helmet and number of rider provisions under section 3597.3 (relating to operation of low-speed electric scooters). The department shall develop a sample notice and post it on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.§ 3597.6. Local enforcement.A city, borough, incorporated town, township or home rule municipality that has its own police department may pass an ordinance to allow for enhanced penalties, for a violation of section 3597.3(b) (relating to operation of low-speed electric scooters). The ordinance may create fines for a first offense, second offense and subsequent offenses but a single fine may not exceed $250.Section 4. This act shall take effect as follows:(1) The addition of 75 Pa.C.S. § 1508(c.2) shall take effect in one year.(2) This section shall take effect immediately.(3) The remainder of this act shall take effect in 90 days.20250SB1008PN1183 - 5 - 1234567891011121314151617181920